Hawaii statutes.
§602-10 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1972, c 88,
§2(h).

§602-10 Full court; oral argument;
substitute justices. Parties to a proceeding before the supreme
court shall be entitled to consideration by a full court. Oral argument shall
be before a full court; provided that in an appropriate case, the court in its
discretion may dispense with oral argument. In case of a vacancy, or if a
justice of the supreme court is disqualified from sitting in any case pending
before the supreme court, is unable to attend, is absent, is recused, or has
been excused, the vacancy or the place of such justice may be temporarily
filled by a circuit judge designated by the chief justice or by the appointment
of a justice who has retired from the supreme court. Such retired justice
chosen to serve as substitute justice shall not be actively engaged in the
practice of law. A retired justice, when sitting as substitute justice, shall
be compensated at a rate of pay of associate justices of the supreme court.
When necessary, the court may consist of five circuit judges so designated, or
five retired justices so appointed, or any combination of circuit judges and
retired justices. After oral argument of a case, if a vacancy arises or if for
any other reason a justice is unable to continue on the case, the case may be
decided or disposed of upon the concurrence of any three members of the court
without filling the vacancy or the place of such justice. [L 1892, c 57, §56;
am L 1896, c 12, §1; am L 1903, c 32, §15; am L 1905, c 92, §1; am L 1909, c
14, §1; RL 1925, §2230; RL 1935, §3599; RL 1945, §9610; RL 1955, §214-10; am L
1963, c 193, §61; HRS §602-11; am L 1972, c 88, §2(f); am L 1974, c 146, §1; am
L 1978, c 114, §1; ren L 1979, c 111, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 202, §56; am L
2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Case Notes

"Cause" in phrase "connection with the said
cause" means issue brought to supreme court, not entire case in lower
court. 9 H. 354 (1894); 20 H. 553 (1911).

Resignation of justice, though absolute in form, does not
under all circumstances at once vacate office. 12 H. 332 (1900).

Duty of justice to sit unless disqualified or unable to sit
for reason specified. 17 H. 393 (1906). See 41 H. 270 (1956).

Petition for rehearing must be acted upon by court as constituted
when case was decided, if all members thereof are available. 45 H. 440, 369
P.2d 114 (1962).

Change in court no bar to grant of rehearing. 50 H. 40, 429
P.2d 829 (1967).

When no disinterested substitutes can be designated, doctrine
of necessity allows interested judges to participate in the case. 57 H. 348,
555 P.2d 1329 (1976).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next